District of Columbia statutes.
28-4801.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Principal and Income Act”.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 502(c), 48 DCR 2087

History

Section 1102 of D.C. Law 13-292 provided: “For purposes of Title 5 and Title 9 and sections 801(b), 805, and 806 of Title 8 of this act, the provisions relating to the administration of decedent’s estates shall apply only to the estates of decedent’s who die on or after the effective date of this act.”

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 101 of the Uniform Principal and Income Act (1997 Act).

Editor's Notes